New Jersey, session 222, A5151.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2018, c.47 (C.39:5H-4.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Paratransit service means any transportation service, other than fixed route transportation service, that is provided by:  the New Jersey Transit Corporation, whether directly or indirectly through contract or subcontract, to comply with the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. s.12101 et seq.); by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1987, c.455 (C.34:16-51 et seq.); and by counties under the Senior Citizen and Disabled Resident Transportation Assistance Act, P.L.1983, c.578 (C.27:25-25 et seq.).  Paratransit service shall include Medicaid transportation service, as delivered through the Medicaid programs non-emergency medical transportation broker and in accordance with the rules and regulations set forth by the Department of Human Services. Prearranged ride, Rider, and Transportation network company [,]  [shall have] mean the same [meanings] as provided in section 2 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-2). Shared ride means a prearranged ride in which: (1)  prior to commencement of the prearranged ride, the rider requested to share the prearranged ride with one or more riders; and (2)  the rider is charged a fare that is calculated, in part, based on the riders request to share all or part of the prearranged ride with one or more riders, regardless of whether the rider actually shares all or part of the ride with one or more riders. b.    Commencing October 1, 2018, there is imposed on a transportation network company rider a surcharge of $0.50 upon every prearranged ride that originates and terminates within the State, except that only a $0.25 surcharge is imposed on the rider of a shared ride.  The surcharge imposed under this section shall be collected by the transportation network company [,] and shall be separately stated on the electronic receipt provided to the rider pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-9).  However, the surcharge authorized pursuant to this subsection shall not be imposed on any transportation network company rider who takes a prearranged ride with a transportation network company for paratransit service. c.    Each transportation network company required to collect the surcharge imposed by this section shall be personally liable for the surcharge imposed, collected, or required to be collected under this section.  [Any such] Each transportation network company shall have the same right [with respect] to [collecting] collect the surcharge from a rider as if the surcharge were a part of the sales price and payable at the same time. d.    In carrying out the provisions of this section, the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury shall have all of the powers and authority granted in P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.).  The surcharge shall be filed and paid by the transportation network company on a monthly basis in a manner prescribed by the director.  The director shall promulgate such rules and regulations as the director determines are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. e.    The surcharge imposed by this section shall be governed by the provisions of the State Uniform Tax Procedure Law, R.S.54:48-1 et seq. (cf:  P.L.2018, c.47, s.1) 2.    (New section) a.  As used in this section: Paratransit service means any transportation service, other than fixed route transportation service, that is provided by:  the New Jersey Transit Corporation, whether directly or indirectly through contract or subcontract, to comply with the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. s.12101 et seq.); by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1987, c.455 (C.34:16-51 et seq.); and by counties under the Senior Citizen and Disabled Resident Transportation Assistance Act, P.L.1983, c.578 (C.27:25-25 et seq.).  Paratransit service shall include Medicaid transportation service, as delivered through the Medicaid programs non-emergency medical transportation broker and in accordance with the rules and regulations set forth by the Department of Human Services. Prearranged ride means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-2). Transportation network company means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-2). b.    A transportation network company that arranges prearranged rides for paratransit service shall not be personally liable for paratransit service rides. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.